Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

General Provisions Applicable to All Bonds and Notes Issued by Local Governments

9-21-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986.”

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-1.

Cross-References. Central business improvement districts, authority to issue bonds, §§7-84-105,7-84-505,7-84-518.

Public entities, information concerning debt obligation issuances, §9-21-134.

Law Reviews.

Financing Public Needs After Tax Reform (Jon G. Roach), 23 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Joint ownership of community center by county and city, OAG 99-109, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (5/12/99).

Authority of city of Memphis to sell assets of Memphis Light, Gas and Water, OAG 05-006, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/20/05).

9-21-102. Intent.

It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to provide a uniform and comprehensive statutory framework authorizing any local government to issue general obligation bonds and revenue bonds for public works projects, general obligation bonds for certain unfunded pension obligations, general obligation refunding bonds, revenue refunding bonds, bond anticipation notes, capital outlay notes, grant anticipation notes, tax anticipation notes, and health care revenue anticipation notes, and to authorize the destruction of bonds, notes and coupons.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-2; 1997, ch. 390, § 1; 2000, ch. 983, § 9.

9-21-103. No indebtedness limit.

Bonds or notes may be issued under this chapter, notwithstanding and without regard to any limit on indebtedness provided by law.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-3.

9-21-104. Negotiability.

Any bonds or notes issued by a local government pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable for all purposes in the absence of an express recital on the face of the bond or note that it is nonnegotiable.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-4.

9-21-105. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bondholder,” “holder of bonds” or any similar term means any person who shall be the bearer of any outstanding bonds, notes or other obligations registered to bearer or not registered, or the registered owner of any such outstanding bonds, notes or other obligations which shall at the time be registered other than to bearer, or the holder of any interim certificate pending the issuance of definitive bonds or notes;

“Bonds” means bonds or interim certificates issued pending preparation or delivery of definitive bonds of a local government issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Certain unfunded other post-employment benefits” means nonpension benefits paid on behalf of former employees of any local government having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or the former employees' beneficiaries after separation from service. The benefits may include, but shall not be limited to, medical, prescription drugs, dental, vision, hearing, medicare part B or part D premiums, life insurance, long-term care, and long-term disability. For purposes of this subdivision (3), the value of any “certain unfunded other post-employment benefits” shall be limited to the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as determined pursuant to the Governmental Accounting Standards Board Statement No. 45 and as certified by the actuarial consultant of the local government;

“Certain unfunded pension obligations” means:

Pension benefits for past service of employees of a local government whose employment results from the local government's assumption of governmental responsibilities of another local government;

Pension benefits for past service of employees of a local government whose pension benefits arise from a defined benefit pension plan that is closed to the enrollment of new employee participants and are funded solely by contributions of the local government to the plan;

Pension benefits for past service of employees of a local government whose pension benefits arise from a defined benefit pension plan adopted by referendum amendment of a county charter, and that limits enrollment to law enforcement employees of the local government. The maturity of any bonds issued under this subdivision (4)(A)(iii) shall not exceed twenty (20) years from the date of the bonds, and the servicing of such bonds shall be subject to review by the office of the comptroller of the treasury; or

Pension benefits for past service of employees of a local government which is either:

A metropolitan government with a general obligation rating of at least Aa1 (or its equivalent) from one (1) or more nationally recognized rating agencies; or

A municipality with a general obligation rating of Aaa (or its equivalent) from one (1) or more nationally recognized rating agencies that is located within a county with a general obligation rating of Aaa (or its equivalent) from one (1) or more nationally recognized rating agencies; and

In either case, whose pension benefits arise from a defined benefit plan administered by the local government;

For purposes of this subdivision (4), the value of any “certain unfunded pension obligations” shall be limited to the unfunded portion of the present value of benefits less the present value of future normal costs, as certified by the pension actuarial consultant of the local government;

Subdivisions (4)(A)(ii) and (iii) shall cease to be effective on July 1, 2008; provided, that no bonds issued pursuant to this subdivision (4) prior to July 1, 2008, shall be rendered ineffectual;

Subdivision (4)(A)(iv) shall cease to be effective on July 1, 2015; provided, that no bonds issued pursuant to this subdivision (4) prior to July 1, 2015, shall be rendered ineffectual;

“Construction” means building, reconstruction, erection, replacement, extension, repairing, betterment, equipment, development, embellishment, improvement, acquisition by gift, lease, purchase or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, or any one (1) or more or all of the foregoing, including the acquisition of land and of rights in land, and including acquisition of all of the outstanding capital stock of any corporation whose assets consist entirely of one (1) or more public works projects which together constitute a waterworks, sewer system, natural gas system, electric system, or any combination thereof, including, but not limited to, a water, sewer, natural gas and/or electric distribution system, or any combination thereof, serving a local government and assets related to the operation thereof and whose liabilities consist entirely of those related to the ownership and operation thereof; provided, that upon any such acquisition of stock by a local government, the corporation thus acquired shall be promptly liquidated by the local government, which shall thereupon acquire its assets and assume its liabilities;

“Contract” or “agreement” between a state or federal agency, or both, and a local government or a local government instrumentality includes contracts and agreements in the customary form and also includes an allotment of funds, resolution, unilateral promise or other commitments by such state or federal agency or agencies by which it shall undertake to make a loan or grant or both, upon performance of specified conditions or with rules and regulations theretofore or thereafter promulgated, prescribed or published by such state or federal agency or agencies. In the case of such an allotment of funds, resolution, unilateral promise or other commitment by a state or federal agency, the terms, conditions and restrictions therein set forth and the rules and regulations theretofore or thereafter promulgated, prescribed or published shall, for the purpose of this chapter, constitute covenants of such a contract that are to be performed by the local government, if the local government accepts any money from such state or federal agency;

“Enterprise” means any one (1) of or combination of two (2) or more public works projects, undertakings or projects which the local government is or may hereafter be authorized to construct and from which the local government has heretofore derived or may hereafter derive revenues, and such enterprise includes all improvements, betterments, extensions and replacements thereto, and all appurtenances, facilities, lands, rights in land, water rights, franchises and structures in connection therewith or incidental thereto;

“Facsimile seal” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the seal of the issuer, official or governing body;

“Facsimile signature” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the manual signature of an authorized officer of a local government;

“Federal agency” includes the United States, the president of the United States, or any agency, instrumentality or corporation of the United States, which has heretofore been or may hereafter be designated, created or authorized by or pursuant to any act or acts or joint resolutions of the congress of the United States, to make loans or grants, or which may be owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the United States;

“Federal aid act” means any act or acts or joint resolution of the congress of the United States to reduce and relieve unemployment, or to provide for the construction of public works, or to relieve and rehabilitate veterans of any war, or to subsidize or aid any local government, public works or construction project by grants of money, materials, equipment or otherwise by any federal agency;

“Financial newspaper” means a financial newspaper, financial journal or other financial publication;

“Governing body” means the legislative body of any local government of this state or any other authority charged with the governing of the affairs of any local government in this state;

“Law” means any act or statute, general, special or local, of this state, including, but not limited to, any local government charter;

(A) “Local government” means any county, municipality or metropolitan government in this state; and

“Local government” also means any separate legal or administrative entity duly created by interlocal agreement between two (2) or more political subdivisions of the state acting pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, IF AND ONLY IF:

Such political subdivisions retain at least secondary liability for the debts of such legal entity;

The terms of such interlocal agreement authorize the entity to exercise powers actually conferred upon such political subdivisions by this chapter; and

The terms of such interlocal agreement conform to the restrictions set forth in §12-9-104(e)(2)(A)(i), (ii) and (iii);

“Local government instrumentality” means any authority created by law on behalf of a county, metropolitan government, municipality or any combination thereof;

“Metropolitan government” means the political entity created by consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the political and corporate functions of a county and a city or cities pursuant to the authority of title 7, chapters 1-3;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or any incorporated town of this state;

“Notes” means notes or interim certificates issued pending preparation or delivery of definitive notes of a local government issued pursuant to this chapter;

“Obligations” means bonds, notes and any other evidence of indebtedness lawfully issued or assumed by a local government;

(A) “Public works project” includes any one (1) or any combination of the following: abattoirs, acquisitions of land for the purpose of providing or preserving open land, airports, alleys, ambulances, auditoriums, bridges, city and town halls, local government stables or garages, community houses, corrective, detention and penal facilities, including, but not limited to, jails, workhouses and reformatories, courthouses, culverts, curbs, dispensaries, drainage systems, including storm water sewers and drains, electric plants and systems, expositions, facilities for the handicapped, including physically and mentally handicapped, facilities for the indigent, fairgrounds and fairground facilities, fire department equipment and buildings, fire alarm systems, flood control, garbage collection and disposal systems, gas and natural gas systems and storage facilities, heat plants and systems, harbor and riverfront improvements, health centers and clinics, including medical and mental health centers and clinics, highways, major roads, highway and street equipment, hospitals, hotels and supporting or incidental facilities built by local governments which are built adjacent to and as a supporting facility of civic or convention centers located in municipalities which have created a central business improvement district under the Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971, compiled in title 7, chapter 84, improvements made pursuant to a plan of improvement for a central business improvement district created pursuant to the Central Business Improvement District Act of 1971, law enforcement and emergency services equipment, levees, libraries, markets, memorials, museums, nursing homes, parks, parking facilities, parkways, playgrounds, plazas, port facilities, docks and dock facilities, including any terminal storage and transportation facilities incident thereto, public art, public buildings, preserves, railroads, including the extension of railroads, and railway beltlines and switches, reclamation of land, recreation centers and facilities, reservoirs, rights-of-way, river and navigation improvements, roads, sanitariums, schools, transportation equipment for schools, sewers, sewage and waste water systems, including, but not limited to, collection, drainage, treatment and disposal systems, ship canals, sidewalks, stadiums, streets, swimming pools, thermal transfer generating plants and/or distribution systems, tunnels, viaducts, voting machines, water treatment distribution and storage systems, wharves and zoos;

“Public works project” also includes:

“Business park,” which includes lands and rights, easements and franchises relating thereto, and may include roads and streets, water, sewer, electric and other utilities, landscaping and related elements as required for the orderly development and use of corporate or professional office space by one (1) or more commercial, financial or service business, and such appurtenant land for necessary incidental use. “Business park” does not include a retail operation except for an incidental retail use. A “business park” shall contain not less than five (5) acres of land. The building finance committee in the industrial development division of the department of economic and community development is authorized and empowered to determine whether a local government shall have the right to engage in any or all of the rights and privileges accompanying such a public works project. Before a local government may undertake the financing of such a public works project, it shall apply to the committee for a certificate of public purpose and necessity. The committee shall issue such a certificate once it is affirmatively determined that:

There are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions so that the total bonded indebtedness of the local government, solely for this authorized purpose and those other purposes authorized by title 7, chapter 55 and title 13, chapter 16, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the local government ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of the issuance of such bonds; and

The project is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect of success, will provide economic development and employment, will tend to encourage businesses to locate there and will not become a burden upon the taxpayers of the local government;

“Industrial park,” which includes lands, rights, easements and franchises relating thereto, and may include adequate roads and streets, water and sewer facilities, utilities and docks and terminals. Any of the foregoing improvements which are to be located within the geographic boundaries of the industrial park may only be financed after compliance with title 13, chapter 16, part 2;

“Urban renewal project” which means the same as such projects which are defined in §§13-20-209 —13-20-215. Any local government is hereby authorized to contribute money, property, and municipal services to any public agency engaged in the development of urban renewal projects in that local government;

“Urban transit facility” which includes any or all real and personal property needed to provide public passenger transportation by means of street railway, electric railway, incline railroad, trolley coach, bus, motor coach, or any combination thereof, including terminal, maintenance and storage facility, whether owned and operated by a local government or owned by a local government and leased to private operators, all of which are hereby found and determined to be in the public interest and a proper public purpose;

Facilities for the storage and maintenance of any of the items of equipment which constitute public works projects; and

Facilities or capital expenditures paid or incurred with respect to property located in a “recovery zone,” as defined in § 1400U-1(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1(b)) [repealed], that are made for a “qualified economic development purpose,” as defined in § 1400U-2(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-2(c)) [repealed];

Facilities or expenditures paid or incurred for “qualified conservation purposes,” as defined in § 54D(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 54D(f)) [repealed], in connection with the issuance of “qualified energy conservation bonds,” as defined in § 54D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 54D) [repealed];

All property real and personal, appurtenant thereto or connected with any public works project, work or undertaking and the existing public works project, work or undertaking, if any, to which such public works project, work or undertaking is an extension, addition, betterment or improvement; and

Facilities or capital expenditures paid or incurred with respect to development of affordable housing or workforce housing in a county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of not less than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, including expenditures related to a housing trust fund established in accordance with title 7, chapter 8 or title 13, chapter 23, part 5. For purposes of this subdivision (21)(B)(ix), only local governments within which the affordable or workforce housing is located are authorized to issue debt or borrow money, and in no event, shall the credit of any county, city, or town be given or loaned to or in aid of any person, company, association, or corporation, within the meaning of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 29, without first complying with the applicable requirements of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 29;

This enumeration does not exclude any other project for the benefit of the people at large of any local government where any state or federal agency will match the funds of the local government with grants-in-aid or gratuities to subsidize or assist the development of a public works project;

Notwithstanding subdivision (21)(B)(i), a certificate of public purpose and necessity shall not be required for a public works project of a local government with a population of not less than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census. The total pledge of full faith and credit of any such local government related to the project shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total assessed valuation of all property in the local government, ascertained by the last completed assessment at the time of issuance of the obligations. In any resolution pledging the full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of any such local government to secure any obligations related to a public works project, the governing body of the local government shall state that the project being considered is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect for success, will provide proper economic development and employment, and will not likely become a burden on the taxpayers of the local government;

“Refinancing” means funding, refunding, paying, or discharging, by means of refunding bonds or the proceeds received from the sale thereof, all or any part of any bonds, notes, or other obligations heretofore or hereafter issued or lawfully assumed and payable solely from all or any part of the revenues of one (1) or more enterprises, or from a combination of such revenues and taxes, except capital outlay notes when retired by bonds in conformance with part 6 of this chapter and notes issued in anticipation of bonds;

“Refunding bonds” means bonds issued to refund all or any part of bonds, notes or other obligations, except capital outlay notes when retired by bonds in conformance with part 6 of this chapter, and notes issued in anticipation of bonds, heretofore or hereafter issued or lawfully assumed by a local government pursuant to this chapter, or any other provision of this code or any other general or special law;

“Revenues” means all fees, rents, tolls, rates, rentals, interest earnings, or other charges received or receivable by the local government from any public works project or enterprise then existing or thereafter to be constructed, including any revenues derived or to be derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with a public works project or enterprise, or all other charges to be levied and collected in connection with and all other income and receipts of whatever kind or character derived by the local government from the operation of any public works project or enterprise or arising from any public works project or enterprise;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“State agency” means any agency of the state created by the general assembly; and

“Taxable property” means all property subject to ad valorem taxation within the local government, or any portion of the local government, if applicable.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-5; 1990, ch. 593, § 6; 1992, ch. 880, § 1; 1997, ch. 390, § 2; 1998, ch. 728, § 1; 1998, ch. 751, § 1; 2004, ch. 705, § 1; 2006, ch. 770, § 1; 2006, ch. 847, § 1; 2007, ch. 131, § 1; 2008, ch. 991, § 1; 2009, ch. 608, § 2; 2010, ch. 868, § 41; 2013, ch. 467, §§ 1-4; 2016, ch. 738, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities and counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

For the Preamble to the act concerning certain unfunded pension obligations for which local governments may issue bonds, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 467.

26 U.S.C. §§ 1400U-1 and 1400U-2, which are referred to in this section, were repealed by March 23, 2018, P. L. 115-141, Div U, Title IV, § 401(d)(6)(A), 132 Stat. 1211, subject to savings provisions, as provided by Sec. 401(d)(6)(C) of P.L. 115-141, which appears as a note to 16 U.S.C. § 1400L. It provided for allocation of recovery zone bonds.

26 U.S.C. § 54D, which is referred to in this section, was repealed by Act Dec. 22, 2017, P. L. 115-97, Title I, Subtitle C, Part V, § 13404(a), 131 Stat. 2138, applicable to bonds issued after 12/31/2017, as provided by § 13404(d) of such Act, which appears as 26 USCS § 54 note. It provided for qualified energy conservation bonds.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal authority to make or guarantee loans to local housing authority, OAG 98-0104, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (6/11/98).

Multi-family housing project not “public works project”, OAG 98-0104, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (6/11/98).

Joint ownership of community center by county and city, OAG 99-109, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (5/12/99).

Sale of city land for golf course, OAG 99-143, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (7/30/99).

Legislation providing that a metropolitan government may issue bonds and notes under the Local Government Public Obligations Act must provide for a referendum. OAG 16-07, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (2/24/2016).

9-21-106. Rate discrimination prohibited.

When a public works project supplies its services to consumers who use solar or wind powered equipment as a source of energy, that public works project shall not discriminate against those consumers by its rates, fees or charges or by altering the availability or quality of energy. Any consumer who uses solar, wind power, or other auxiliary source of energy shall install and operate the equipment, property, or appliance for such energy source in compliance with any state or local code or regulation applicable to the safe operation of such equipment, property or appliance.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-6.

9-21-107. Powers of local governments.

All local governments have the power and are authorized, either singly or jointly with any one (1) or more other local governments, local government instrumentalities, the state, or a state or federal agency or jointly with one (1) or more of the above, to:

Engage in the construction of any public works project which may be constructed within or without the local government, or partially within and partially without the local government. However, no local government shall engage in the construction of a public works project wholly or partly within the legal boundaries of another local government, other than to perform maintenance on or make improvements to its existing public works projects in its service area, except with the consent of the governing body of the other local government; provided, that any county or metropolitan government may construct a public works project within a municipality within the county or metropolitan government without the permission of the governing body of the municipality;

Operate and maintain any public works project for its own purpose or for the benefit and use of its inhabitants and, in the case of municipalities, also to operate and maintain such public works project for the benefit and use of the municipality and persons, firms and corporations therein and persons, firms and corporations, including municipal corporations, which are situated or whose residences or places of business are situated outside the territorial boundaries of the municipality but within the state and within a radius of twenty (20) miles from the territorial boundaries of the municipality; provided, that a joint project of any local government may, by agreement of the joint participants be operated or maintained, or both, by the local government itself, or by any one (1) of the other joint participants, or jointly by the local government and any one (1) or more of the joint participants, or jointly by any of the joint participants other than the local government;

Contract debts for the construction of any public works project or for the local government's share of the cost of any joint public works project;

Contract debts in order to make grants, donations, reimbursements or loans to one (1) or more local governments, local government instrumentalities, or utility districts for the construction of any public works project;

Borrow money;

Issue bonds or notes to finance such construction, grant, donation, reimbursement or loan;

Provide for the rights of the holders of such bonds or notes; and

Secure such bonds or notes as hereinafter provided;

Pledge the full faith, credit and unlimited taxing power of the local government as to all taxable property in the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds or notes issued to finance any public works project, except bonds or notes and the interest thereon payable exclusively from revenues of a public works project;

In the case of a county or metropolitan government which contains within its boundaries a special school district and/or incorporated city or town maintaining a public school system separate from the county or metropolitan government public school system, the tax pledge authorized by subdivision (4), when pledged to the payment of bonds or notes issued to finance the construction of public schools of the county or metropolitan government serving outside the territorial limits of such special school district and/or incorporated city or town, may be a pledge of taxes to be levied only upon taxable property within that portion of the county or metropolitan government lying outside the territorial limits of such special school district and/or incorporated city or town;

In the case of a county or metropolitan government which contains within its boundaries an incorporated city or town which constructs and maintains its streets, avenues, alleys and other highways separate from the county or metropolitan government, the tax pledge authorized by subdivision (4), when pledged to the payment of bonds or notes issued to finance the construction of streets, avenues, alleys and other highways of the county or metropolitan government lying outside the territorial limits of such incorporated city or town may be a pledge of taxes to be levied only upon taxable property within that portion of the county or metropolitan government lying outside the territorial limits of such incorporated city or town;

Assess, levy and collect ad valorem taxes on all taxable property within the local government or a portion of the local government, if applicable, sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds or notes issued to finance any public works project, except bonds or notes and the interest thereon payable exclusively from revenues of a public works project;

Fix, levy and collect fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of or in connection with any public works project and, in the event any agreements with holders of bonds or notes shall have been made as hereinafter provided, to fix, levy and collect such fees, rents, tolls and other charges in accordance with and subject to such agreements. Such fees, rents, tolls and other charges may also include any revenues derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with a public works project. The power to fix, levy, and collect such fees, rents, tolls, or other charges includes the power to impose charges for the privilege of parking motor vehicles in or upon any on-street or off-street parking facilities, and the power to facilitate the collection of such parking fees or other charges by the use of parking meters;

Pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, or other charges received or receivable by the local government from any public works project or projects then existing or thereafter to be constructed, including also any revenues derived or to be derived by a local government from a lease, agreement or contract with any other local government, local government instrumentality, the state, or a state or federal agency for the use of or in connection with such public works project or projects, to the payment of all operating expenses of the public works project or projects, to the punctual payment of the principal of and interest on bonds or notes issued to finance such public works project or projects, or any other public works project or projects, or if the governing body of the local government shall by resolution so request, payments to the local government in lieu of ad valorem taxes on the property constituting such public works project or projects, not to exceed the amount of taxes payable on privately owned property of similar nature, and to covenant against thereafter pledging any such fees, rents, tolls, or charges to any other bonds or notes or any other obligations of the local government;

Acquire by purchase, gift or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, to lease as lessor or lessee, and to hold, dispose of, and convey any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any right or interest in any such property, in connection with any public works project, whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, and to construct any public works project subject thereto. In the acquisition of public works projects, no governing body shall have the right to exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to real or personal property which has been dedicated to a public use, or which is at the time being so used, unless the owners or authorities having jurisdiction over the property agree to such acquisition. No governing body shall construct any structure of any type on or over any property which has been dedicated to public use, or which is at the time being so used, unless the owners or authorities having jurisdiction over the property agree to the construction of such structure. A local government may use any right-of-way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a public works project held by the state or any other local government; provided, that the state or such other local government consents to such use;

Enter on any lands, waters and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings and examinations in or for the furtherance of any public works project;

Make contracts and execute instruments containing such terms, provisions and conditions as in the discretion of the governing body may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining a grant, loan or other financial assistance from the state or any state or federal agency pursuant to a state or federal aid act; make all other contracts and execute all other instruments necessary, proper or advisable in or for the furtherance of any public works project; and carry out and perform the terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

Accept from any state or federal agency grants for or in aid of the construction of any public works project;

Subscribe to and comply with any state or federal aid act and any rules and regulations made by the state or any state or federal agency with regard to any grants or loans, or both;

Exercise, for the purpose of obtaining a grant, loan or other financial assistance from the state or any state or federal agency pursuant to or by virtue of any state or federal aid act, any power conferred by this chapter independently or in conjunction with any other power or powers conferred by this chapter or heretofore or hereafter conferred by any other law;

Lease all or any portion of off-street parking facilities for the purpose of parking motor vehicles to any person, firm or corporation, for operation by such person, firm or corporation, and fix and collect rentals therefor and make contracts for the operation and management thereof. All revenues derived from any such lease or contract shall be regarded as fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of, or in connection with, the facilities;

Lease all or any portion of urban transit facilities to any person, firm, or corporation, for operation by such person, firm or corporation, and to fix and collect rentals therefor and make contracts for the operation and management thereof, notwithstanding the fact that the local government may or may not then operate its own urban transit facilities. All revenues derived from any such lease or contract shall be regarded as fees, rents, tolls or other charges for the use of, or in connection with, the respective facilities;

Combine all or any parts of parking facilities into a single public works project. Nothing contained in this chapter shall in any way affect the validity of any private act now existing or which may hereafter be enacted, prohibiting any local government from engaging in the public parking business;

Provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or notes;

Perform any powers or duties authorized under this chapter through, or by means of, its own officers, agents and employees, or by contract with private corporations, firms or individuals;

Designate one (1) or more areas that meet the requirements of § 1400U-1(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1(b)) [repealed], as a recovery zone for purposes of that section; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-7; 1987, ch. 77, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 683, § 1; 2009, ch. 74, § 2; 2009, ch. 608, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. 26 U.S.C. § 1400U-1, which is referred to in this section, was repealed by March 23, 2018, P. L. 115-141, Div U, Title IV, § 401(d)(6)(A), 132 Stat. 1211, subject to savings provisions, as provided by Sec. 401(d)(6)(C) of P.L. 115-141, which appears as a note to 16 U.S.C. § 1400L. It provided for allocation of recovery zone bonds.

Attorney General Opinions. Projects outside municipal limits financed under Local Public Obligations Act, OAG 96-005, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/16/96).

Franklin special school district — avoiding county tax for bonds for school purposes, OAG 00-024, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/15/00).

A municipality is authorized to take and condemn lands to lay a sewer line through another municipality; however, if the utility is financed under the Revenue Bond Law or the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, the municipality building the utility through the territory of another municipality must obtain the consent of the latter's governing body, OAG 01-098, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (6/13/01).

Domestic nonprofit water cooperative merging with or transferring assets to municipality, OAG 06-176, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 196 (12/19/06).

9-21-108. Governing body authorized to act by resolution — Procedure for adoption of resolutions.

All actions required or authorized to be taken under this chapter by the governing body of a local government may be by resolution. The resolution may be adopted at the meeting, regular or special, of the governing body at which the resolution is introduced, and shall take effect immediately upon adoption. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no resolution under this chapter need be published or posted, nor shall any such resolution be subject to veto by the chief executive officer or presiding officer of the governing body, nor shall any such resolution require for its passage more than a majority vote of all the members of the governing body then in office. The resolution may delegate authority to the chief executive officer of the local government to sell notes or bonds under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 1-8; 1994, ch. 806, § 6.